Nevada, session 83, SB333.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board
for personnel, operating, equipment and travel expenses and the cost
of consulting services the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $300,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $290,000
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the Southern Nevada Enterprise Community Board agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Southern
Nevada Enterprise Community Board through December 1, 2026;
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
-
*SB333*

– 2 –
from the date on which the money was received by the Southern
Nevada Enterprise Community Board through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make
available to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts,
claims, reports, vouchers or other records of information,
confidential or otherwise, of the Southern Nevada Enterprise
Community Board, regardless of their form or location, that the
Legislative Auditor deems necessary to conduct an audit of the use
of the money appropriated by subsection 1.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB333*